Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-149
Assignment of lien rights; recording; effect.

(1) A claimant having a recorded lien, or his or her assignee, may record an assignment signed by the claimant which sets forth the name of the claimant, the name and address of the assignee, the person against whom the lien is claimed, the real estate affected with a description thereof sufficient for identification, and the record location and date of the recording of the notice of lien.

(2) Even though an assignment has been recorded, an owner may continue to deal with the original claimant as to the claim until the owner receives notice of the assignment and a direction that no arrangements or payments may be made without the assignee's consent. If requested by the owner, the assignee must furnish reasonable proof that an assignment has been made and unless he or she does so, the owner may pay the assignor.

(3) Unless a statement of assignment is recorded, the assignee need not be a party to any judicial proceeding to foreclose a security interest, lien, or other encumbrance.

(4) The failure to record an assignment does not otherwise affect its validity.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 25.